Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-103
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Election Act, the definitions found in sections 32-104 to 32-120 and 32-123 shall be used.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 9;

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB1055, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB843, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB514, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 8.